Georgia statutes. TITLE 53 Wills, Trusts, and Administration of Estates
Article 1 General Provisions

Law reviews.

For article, “Probate Matters,” see 20 Ga. B.J. 183 (1957).

For article, “Probate and Administration of Small Estates in Georgia: Some Proposals for Reform,” see 6 Ga. L. Rev. 74 (1971).

For article, “The Probate and Establishment of Domestic and Foreign Wills: An Analysis of Statutory Requirements,” see 13 Ga. L. Rev. 133 (1978).

53-5-1.
Jurisdiction and domicile.

The probate court shall have exclusive jurisdiction over the probate of wills.

The county of domicile of the testator at death shall give jurisdiction to the probate court of that county.

The domicile of a testator who was in the care of a nursing home or other similar facility at the time of death shall be presumed to be the county in which the testator was domiciled immediately before entering the nursing home or other facility; provided, however, this presumption may be rebutted. If it is determined by the probate court that the testator considered or, in the absence of an impairment of mental faculties, the testator would have considered the county in which the facility is located to be the testator’s domicile, then for purposes of this Code section that county shall be considered the testator’s county of domicile.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-5-1

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 504, § 10.

Cross references.

Probate courts generally, T. 15, C. 9.

Jurisdiction of judge of probate court to grant administration on estates, §

15-9-31

.

53-5-2.
Right to offer will for probate; “interested person” defined.

As used in this Code section, the term “interested person” shall include, but shall not necessarily be limited to, any heir of the decedent; legatee, devisee, or beneficiary under the will; creditor of the decedent; purchaser from an heir of the decedent; administrator or temporary administrator appointed for the estate of the decedent prior to the discovery of the will; trustee or beneficiary of a testamentary trust established by the will or of a trust to which the will makes a devise or bequest; and individual making a claim under, or having standing to caveat to the probate of, an earlier will. An agent, conservator, guardian, guardian ad litem, or other fiduciary or appropriate representative of such an interested person may act on such interested person’s behalf.

The right to offer a will for probate shall belong to the executor, if one is named. If for any reason the executor fails to offer the will for probate with reasonable promptness, or if no executor is named, any interested person may offer the will for probate.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-5-2

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 504, § 10; Ga. L. 2018, p. 356, § 3-1/SB 436; Ga. L. 2020, p. 377, § 1-17/HB 865.

The 2020 amendment,

effective January 1, 2021, inserted subsection (a); redesignated the existing provisions as subsection (b); and, in subsection (b), deleted the last sentence, which read: “As used in this Code section, the term ‘interested person’ shall include, but shall not be limited to, any legatee, devisee, creditor of the decedent, purchaser from an heir of the decedent, an administrator appointed for the decedent prior to the discovery of the will, and any individual making a claim under an earlier will”.

Law reviews.

For annual survey on wills, trusts, guardianships, and fiduciary administration, see 67 Mercer L. Rev. 273 (2015).

For article with annual survey on wills, trusts, guardianships, and fiduciary administration, see 73 Mercer L. Rev. 281 (2021).

53-5-3.
Time limitation.

As used in this Code section, the term “will” includes a codicil.

A will shall not be offered for probate following the expiration of five years from the earlier of:

The latest date on which a petition is filed for the appointment of a personal representative of the decedent’s estate, an order that no administration is necessary on the decedent’s estate, or the probate of a different will; or

The date of entry of a final order granting any petition of the sort described in paragraph (1) of this subsection that remains in continuing force and effect.

The offering of a will for probate following the entry of an order of the sort described in paragraph (2) of subsection (b) of this Code section shall constitute a claim against a decedent’s estate that arose before the death of the decedent for purposes of Code Section 9-3-36.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-5-3

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 504, § 10; Ga. L. 1997, p. 1352, § 8; Ga. L. 2008, p. 715, § 9/SB 508; Ga. L. 2020, p. 377, § 1-18/HB 865.

The 2020 amendment,

effective January 1, 2021, added subsection (a); redesignated and rewrote the
previously existing provisions as subsection (b), which read: “A will shall not be offered for probate following the expiration of five years from the latest date on which a petition is filed for:

“(1) The appointment of a personal representative of the decedent’s estate; or

“(2) An order that no administration is necessary on the decedent’s estate;

“provided, however, that the will of a testator who died prior to January 1, 1998, may be offered for probate at least until December 31, 2002.”; and added subsection (c).

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2008, in paragraph (1), “or” was added at the end; and, in paragraph (2), “or” was deleted preceding “An order”.

Law reviews.

For article commenting on the 1997 amendment of this Code section, see 14 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 313 (1997).

For survey article on wills, trusts, guardianships, and fiduciary administration, see 60 Mercer L. Rev. 417 (2008).

53-5-4.
Recovery of property from bona fide purchaser for value.

An executor acting under or any person claiming under a will offered for probate within the period described in Code Section 53-5-3 shall be permitted to recover from a bona fide purchaser for value:

Property acquired from the heirs of the testator or anyone claiming through them, unless an order that no administration is necessary was entered prior to the purchase and the purchase occurred prior to the probate of the will;

Property set aside in a year’s support proceeding and acquired from the spouse or children of the testator or anyone claiming through them, unless the order granting year’s support was entered prior to the purchase and the purchase occurred prior to the probate of the will; and

Property acquired from the administrator of the testator’s estate or the heirs of the testator or anyone claiming through them, unless the administrator was qualified prior to the purchase and the purchase occurred prior to the probate of the will.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-5-4

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 504, § 10.

53-5-5.
Duty to file will.

A person having possession of a will shall file it with reasonable promptness with the probate court of the county having jurisdiction. The probate court may attach for contempt and may fine and imprison a person withholding a will until the will is delivered.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-5-5

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 504, § 10.

53-5-6.
Admission of executor before qualification or of a beneficiary.

On the investigation of an issue of devisavit vel non, the admission of an executor before qualification or of a beneficiary, other than a sole beneficiary, shall not be admissible in evidence to impeach the will except where the admission is in reference to the conduct or acts of the executor or beneficiary concerning some matter relevant to the issue.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-5-6

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 504, § 10.

Law reviews.

For annual survey of law of wills, trusts, guardianships, and fiduciary administration, see 56 Mercer L. Rev. 457 (2004).

53-5-7.
Proof of codicil.

If a codicil republished a will except as to any amendment contained in the codicil and clearly identified the will that was republished, proof of the codicil is proof of the will.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-5-7

, enacted by Ga. L. 1997, p. 1352, § 9.

Law reviews.

For article commenting on the enactment of this Code section, see 14 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 313 (1997).